Illinois, session 104th, HB1347.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 21 and 42 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/21)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1021)7    Sec. 21. Prohibited acts. No person shall:8    (a) Cause or allow the open dumping of any waste.9    (b) Abandon, dump, or deposit any waste upon the public 10highways or other public property, except in a sanitary 11landfill approved by the Agency pursuant to regulations 12adopted by the Board.13    (c) Abandon any vehicle in violation of the "Abandoned 14Vehicles Amendment to the Illinois Vehicle Code", as enacted 15by the 76th General Assembly.16    (d) Conduct any waste-storage, waste-treatment, or 17waste-disposal operation:18        (1) without a permit granted by the Agency or in 19    violation of any conditions imposed by such permit, 20    including periodic reports and full access to adequate 21    records and the inspection of facilities, as may be 22    necessary to assure compliance with this Act and with 23    regulations and standards adopted thereunder; provided,   HB1347- 2 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    however, that, except for municipal solid waste landfill 2    units that receive waste on or after October 9, 1993, and 3    CCR surface impoundments, no permit shall be required for 4    (i) any person conducting a waste-storage, 5    waste-treatment, or waste-disposal operation for wastes 6    generated by such person's own activities which are 7    stored, treated, or disposed within the site where such 8    wastes are generated, (ii) until one year after the 9    effective date of rules adopted by the Board under 10    subsection (n) of Section 22.38, a facility located in a 11    county with a population over 700,000 as of January 1, 12    2000, operated and located in accordance with Section 13    22.38 of this Act, and used exclusively for the transfer, 14    storage, or treatment of general construction or 15    demolition debris, provided that the facility was 16    receiving construction or demolition debris on August 24, 17    2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-611), or (iii) 18    any person conducting a waste transfer, storage, 19    treatment, or disposal operation, including, but not 20    limited to, a waste transfer or waste composting 21    operation, under a mass animal mortality event plan 22    created by the Department of Agriculture;23        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 24    adopted by the Board under this Act;25        (3) which receives waste after August 31, 1988, does 26    not have a permit issued by the Agency, and is (i) a   HB1347- 3 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    landfill used exclusively for the disposal of waste 2    generated at the site, (ii) a surface impoundment 3    receiving special waste not listed in an NPDES permit, 4    (iii) a waste pile in which the total volume of waste is 5    greater than 100 cubic yards or the waste is stored for 6    over one year, or (iv) a land treatment facility receiving 7    special waste generated at the site; without giving notice 8    of the operation to the Agency by January 1, 1989, or 30 9    days after the date on which the operation commences, 10    whichever is later, and every 3 years thereafter. The form 11    for such notification shall be specified by the Agency, 12    and shall be limited to information regarding: the name 13    and address of the location of the operation; the type of 14    operation; the types and amounts of waste stored, treated 15    or disposed of on an annual basis; the remaining capacity 16    of the operation; and the remaining expected life of the 17    operation.18    Item (3) of this subsection (d) shall not apply to any 19person engaged in agricultural activity who is disposing of a 20substance that constitutes solid waste, if the substance was 21acquired for use by that person on his own property, and the 22substance is disposed of on his own property in accordance 23with regulations or standards adopted by the Board.24    This subsection (d) shall not apply to hazardous waste.25    (e) Dispose, treat, store or abandon any waste, or 26transport any waste into this State for disposal, treatment,   HB1347- 4 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1storage or abandonment, except at a site or facility which 2meets the requirements of this Act and of regulations and 3standards thereunder.4    (f) Conduct any hazardous waste-storage, hazardous 5waste-treatment or hazardous waste-disposal operation:6        (1) without a RCRA permit for the site issued by the 7    Agency under subsection (d) of Section 39 of this Act, or 8    in violation of any condition imposed by such permit, 9    including periodic reports and full access to adequate 10    records and the inspection of facilities, as may be 11    necessary to assure compliance with this Act and with 12    regulations and standards adopted thereunder; or13        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 14    adopted by the Board under this Act; or15        (3) in violation of any RCRA permit filing requirement 16    established under standards adopted by the Board under 17    this Act; or18        (4) in violation of any order adopted by the Board 19    under this Act.20    Notwithstanding the above, no RCRA permit shall be 21required under this subsection or subsection (d) of Section 39 22of this Act for any person engaged in agricultural activity 23who is disposing of a substance which has been identified as a 24hazardous waste, and which has been designated by Board 25regulations as being subject to this exception, if the 26substance was acquired for use by that person on his own   HB1347- 5 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1property and the substance is disposed of on his own property 2in accordance with regulations or standards adopted by the 3Board.4    (g) Conduct any hazardous waste-transportation operation:5        (1) without registering with and obtaining a special 6    waste hauling permit from the Agency in accordance with 7    the regulations adopted by the Board under this Act; or8        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 9    adopted by the Board under this Act.10    (h) Conduct any hazardous waste-recycling or hazardous 11waste-reclamation or hazardous waste-reuse operation in 12violation of any regulations, standards or permit requirements 13adopted by the Board under this Act.14    (i) Conduct any process or engage in any act which 15produces hazardous waste in violation of any regulations or 16standards adopted by the Board under subsections (a) and (c) 17of Section 22.4 of this Act.18    (j) Conduct any special waste-transportation operation in 19violation of any regulations, standards or permit requirements 20adopted by the Board under this Act. However, sludge from a 21water or sewage treatment plant owned and operated by a unit of 22local government which (1) is subject to a sludge management 23plan approved by the Agency or a permit granted by the Agency, 24and (2) has been tested and determined not to be a hazardous 25waste as required by applicable State and federal laws and 26regulations, may be transported in this State without a   HB1347- 6 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1special waste hauling permit, and the preparation and carrying 2of a manifest shall not be required for such sludge under the 3rules of the Pollution Control Board. The unit of local 4government which operates the treatment plant producing such 5sludge shall file an annual report with the Agency identifying 6the volume of such sludge transported during the reporting 7period, the hauler of the sludge, and the disposal sites to 8which it was transported. This subsection (j) shall not apply 9to hazardous waste.10    (k) Fail or refuse to pay any fee imposed under this Act.11    (l) Locate a hazardous waste disposal site above an active 12or inactive shaft or tunneled mine or within 2 miles of an 13active fault in the earth's crust. In counties of population 14less than 225,000 no hazardous waste disposal site shall be 15located (1) within 1 1/2 miles of the corporate limits as 16defined on June 30, 1978, of any municipality without the 17approval of the governing body of the municipality in an 18official action; or (2) within 1000 feet of an existing 19private well or the existing source of a public water supply 20measured from the boundary of the actual active permitted site 21and excluding existing private wells on the property of the 22permit applicant. The provisions of this subsection do not 23apply to publicly owned sewage works or the disposal or 24utilization of sludge from publicly owned sewage works.25    (m) Transfer interest in any land which has been used as a 26hazardous waste disposal site without written notification to   HB1347- 7 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1the Agency of the transfer and to the transferee of the 2conditions imposed by the Agency upon its use under subsection 3(g) of Section 39.4    (n) Use any land which has been used as a hazardous waste 5disposal site except in compliance with conditions imposed by 6the Agency under subsection (g) of Section 39.7    (o) Conduct a sanitary landfill operation which is 8required to have a permit under subsection (d) of this 9Section, in a manner which results in any of the following 10conditions:11        (1) refuse in standing or flowing waters;12        (2) leachate flows entering waters of the State;13        (3) leachate flows exiting the landfill confines (as 14    determined by the boundaries established for the landfill 15    by a permit issued by the Agency);16        (4) open burning of refuse in violation of Section 9 17    of this Act;18        (5) uncovered refuse remaining from any previous 19    operating day or at the conclusion of any operating day, 20    unless authorized by permit;21        (6) failure to provide final cover within time limits 22    established by Board regulations;23        (7) acceptance of wastes without necessary permits;24        (8) scavenging as defined by Board regulations;25        (9) deposition of refuse in any unpermitted portion of 26    the landfill;  HB1347- 8 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        (10) acceptance of a special waste without a required 2    manifest;3        (11) failure to submit reports required by permits or 4    Board regulations;5        (12) failure to collect and contain litter from the 6    site by the end of each operating day;7        (13) failure to submit any cost estimate for the site 8    or any performance bond or other security for the site as 9    required by this Act or Board rules.10    The prohibitions specified in this subsection (o) shall be 11enforceable by the Agency either by administrative citation 12under Section 31.1 of this Act or as otherwise provided by this 13Act. The specific prohibitions in this subsection do not limit 14the power of the Board to establish regulations or standards 15applicable to sanitary landfills.16    (p) In violation of subdivision (a) of this Section, cause 17or allow the open dumping of any waste in a manner which 18results in any of the following occurrences at the dump site:19        (1) litter;20        (2) scavenging;21        (3) open burning;22        (4) deposition of waste in standing or flowing waters;23        (5) proliferation of disease vectors;24        (6) standing or flowing liquid discharge from the dump 25    site;26        (7) deposition of:  HB1347- 9 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1            (i) general construction or demolition debris as 2        defined in Section 3.160(a) of this Act; or3            (ii) clean construction or demolition debris as 4        defined in Section 3.160(b) of this Act.5    The prohibitions specified in this subsection (p) shall be 6enforceable by the Agency either by administrative citation 7under Section 31.1 of this Act or as otherwise provided by this 8Act. The specific prohibitions in this subsection do not limit 9the power of the Board to establish regulations or standards 10applicable to open dumping.11    (q) Conduct a landscape waste composting operation without 12an Agency permit, provided, however, that no permit shall be 13required for any person:14        (1) conducting a landscape waste composting operation 15    for landscape wastes generated by such person's own 16    activities which are stored, treated, or disposed of 17    within the site where such wastes are generated; or18        (1.5) conducting a landscape waste composting 19    operation that (i) has no more than 25 cubic yards of 20    landscape waste, composting additives, composting 21    material, or end-product compost on-site at any one time 22    and (ii) is not engaging in commercial activity; or 23        (2) applying landscape waste or composted landscape 24    waste at agronomic rates; or25        (2.5) operating a landscape waste composting facility 26    at a site having 10 or more occupied non-farm residences   HB1347- 10 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    within 1/2 mile of its boundaries, if the facility meets 2    all of the following criteria: 3            (A) the composting facility is operated by the 4        farmer on property on which the composting material is 5        utilized, and the composting facility constitutes no 6        more than 2% of the site's total acreage;7            (A-5) any composting additives that the composting 8        facility accepts and uses at the facility are 9        necessary to provide proper conditions for composting 10        and do not exceed 10% of the total composting material 11        at the facility at any one time; 12            (B) the property on which the composting facility 13        is located, and any associated property on which the 14        compost is used, is principally and diligently devoted 15        to the production of agricultural crops and is not 16        owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by any waste 17        hauler or generator of nonagricultural compost 18        materials, and the operator of the composting facility 19        is not an employee, partner, shareholder, or in any 20        way connected with or controlled by any such waste 21        hauler or generator; 22            (C) all compost generated by the composting 23        facility, except incidental sales of finished compost, 24        is applied at agronomic rates and used as mulch, 25        fertilizer, or soil conditioner on land actually 26        farmed by the person operating the composting   HB1347- 11 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        facility, and the finished compost is not stored at 2        the composting site for a period longer than 18 months 3        prior to its application as mulch, fertilizer, or soil 4        conditioner; 5            (D) no fee is charged for the acceptance of 6        materials to be composted at the facility; and 7            (E) the owner or operator, by January 1, 2014 (or 8        the January 1 following commencement of operation, 9        whichever is later) and January 1 of each year 10        thereafter, registers the site with the Agency, (ii) 11        reports to the Agency on the volume of composting 12        material received and used at the site; (iii) 13        certifies to the Agency that the site complies with 14        the requirements set forth in subparagraphs (A), 15        (A-5), (B), (C), and (D) of this paragraph (2.5); and 16        (iv) certifies to the Agency that all composting 17        material was placed more than 200 feet from the 18        nearest potable water supply well, was placed outside 19        the boundary of the 10-year floodplain or on a part of 20        the site that is floodproofed, was placed at least 1/4 21        mile from the nearest residence (other than a 22        residence located on the same property as the 23        facility) or a lesser distance from the nearest 24        residence (other than a residence located on the same 25        property as the facility) if the municipality in which 26        the facility is located has by ordinance approved a   HB1347- 12 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        lesser distance than 1/4 mile, and was placed more 2        than 5 feet above the water table; any ordinance 3        approving a residential setback of less than 1/4 mile 4        that is used to meet the requirements of this 5        subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2.5) of this subsection 6        must specifically reference this paragraph; or 7        (3) operating a landscape waste composting facility on 8    a farm, if the facility meets all of the following 9    criteria:10            (A) the composting facility is operated by the 11        farmer on property on which the composting material is 12        utilized, and the composting facility constitutes no 13        more than 2% of the property's total acreage, except 14        that the Board may allow a higher percentage for 15        individual sites where the owner or operator has 16        demonstrated to the Board that the site's soil 17        characteristics or crop needs require a higher rate;18            (A-1) the composting facility accepts from other 19        agricultural operations for composting with landscape 20        waste no materials other than uncontaminated and 21        source-separated (i) crop residue and other 22        agricultural plant residue generated from the 23        production and harvesting of crops and other customary 24        farm practices, including, but not limited to, stalks, 25        leaves, seed pods, husks, bagasse, and roots and (ii) 26        plant-derived animal bedding, such as straw or   HB1347- 13 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        sawdust, that is free of manure and was not made from 2        painted or treated wood; 3            (A-2) any composting additives that the composting 4        facility accepts and uses at the facility are 5        necessary to provide proper conditions for composting 6        and do not exceed 10% of the total composting material 7        at the facility at any one time; 8            (B) the property on which the composting facility 9        is located, and any associated property on which the 10        compost is used, is principally and diligently devoted 11        to the production of agricultural crops and is not 12        owned, leased or otherwise controlled by any waste 13        hauler or generator of nonagricultural compost 14        materials, and the operator of the composting facility 15        is not an employee, partner, shareholder, or in any 16        way connected with or controlled by any such waste 17        hauler or generator;18            (C) all compost generated by the composting 19        facility, except incidental sales of finished compost, 20        is applied at agronomic rates and used as mulch, 21        fertilizer or soil conditioner on land actually farmed 22        by the person operating the composting facility, and 23        the finished compost is not stored at the composting 24        site for a period longer than 18 months prior to its 25        application as mulch, fertilizer, or soil conditioner;26            (D) the owner or operator, by January 1 of each   HB1347- 14 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        year, (i) registers the site with the Agency, (ii) 2        reports to the Agency on the volume of composting 3        material received and used at the site and the volume 4        of material comprising the incidental sale of finished 5        compost under this subsection (q), (iii) certifies to 6        the Agency that the site complies with the 7        requirements set forth in subparagraphs (A), (A-1), 8        (A-2), (B), and (C) of this paragraph (q)(3), and (iv) 9        certifies to the Agency that all composting material: 10                (I) was placed more than 200 feet from the 11            nearest potable water supply well;12                (II) was placed outside the boundary of the 13            10-year floodplain or on a part of the site that is 14            floodproofed;15                (III) was placed either (aa) at least 1/4 mile 16            from the nearest residence (other than a residence 17            located on the same property as the facility) and 18            there are not more than 10 occupied non-farm 19            residences within 1/2 mile of the boundaries of 20            the site on the date of application or (bb) a 21            lesser distance from the nearest residence (other 22            than a residence located on the same property as 23            the facility) provided that the municipality or 24            county in which the facility is located has by 25            ordinance approved a lesser distance than 1/4 mile 26            and there are not more than 10 occupied non-farm   HB1347- 15 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1            residences within 1/2 mile of the boundaries of 2            the site on the date of application; and3                (IV) was placed more than 5 feet above the 4            water table. 5            Any ordinance approving a residential setback of 6        less than 1/4 mile that is used to meet the 7        requirements of this subparagraph (D) must 8        specifically reference this subparagraph.9    For the purposes of this subsection (q), "agronomic rates" 10means the application of not more than 20 tons per acre per 11year, except that the Board may allow a higher rate for 12individual sites where the owner or operator has demonstrated 13to the Board that the site's soil characteristics or crop 14needs require a higher rate.15    For the purposes of this subsection (q), "incidental sale 16of finished compost" means the sale of finished compost that 17meets general use compost standards and is no more than 20% or 18300 cubic yards, whichever is less, of the total compost 19created annually by a private landowner for the landowner's 20own use. 21    (r) Cause or allow the storage or disposal of coal 22combustion waste unless:23        (1) such waste is stored or disposed of at a site or 24    facility for which a permit has been obtained or is not 25    otherwise required under subsection (d) of this Section; 26    or  HB1347- 16 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        (2) such waste is stored or disposed of as a part of 2    the design and reclamation of a site or facility which is 3    an abandoned mine site in accordance with the Abandoned 4    Mined Lands and Water Reclamation Act; or5        (3) such waste is stored or disposed of at a site or 6    facility which is operating under NPDES and Subtitle D 7    permits issued by the Agency pursuant to regulations 8    adopted by the Board for mine-related water pollution and 9    permits issued pursuant to the federal Surface Mining 10    Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-87) or the 11    rules and regulations thereunder or any law or rule or 12    regulation adopted by the State of Illinois pursuant 13    thereto, and the owner or operator of the facility agrees 14    to accept the waste; and either:15            (i) such waste is stored or disposed of in 16        accordance with requirements applicable to refuse 17        disposal under regulations adopted by the Board for 18        mine-related water pollution and pursuant to NPDES and 19        Subtitle D permits issued by the Agency under such 20        regulations; or21            (ii) the owner or operator of the facility 22        demonstrates all of the following to the Agency, and 23        the facility is operated in accordance with the 24        demonstration as approved by the Agency: (1) the 25        disposal area will be covered in a manner that will 26        support continuous vegetation, (2) the facility will   HB1347- 17 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        be adequately protected from wind and water erosion, 2        (3) the pH will be maintained so as to prevent 3        excessive leaching of metal ions, and (4) adequate 4        containment or other measures will be provided to 5        protect surface water and groundwater from 6        contamination at levels prohibited by this Act, the 7        Illinois Groundwater Protection Act, or regulations 8        adopted pursuant thereto.9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Title, the 10disposal of coal combustion waste pursuant to item (2) or (3) 11of this subdivision (r) shall be exempt from the other 12provisions of this Title V, and notwithstanding the provisions 13of Title X of this Act, the Agency is authorized to grant 14experimental permits which include provision for the disposal 15of wastes from the combustion of coal and other materials 16pursuant to items (2) and (3) of this subdivision (r).17    (s) After April 1, 1989, offer for transportation, 18transport, deliver, receive or accept special waste for which 19a manifest is required, unless the manifest indicates that the 20fee required under Section 22.8 of this Act has been paid.21    (t) Cause or allow a lateral expansion of a municipal 22solid waste landfill unit on or after October 9, 1993, without 23a permit modification, granted by the Agency, that authorizes 24the lateral expansion.25    (u) Conduct any vegetable by-product treatment, storage, 26disposal or transportation operation in violation of any   HB1347- 18 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1regulation, standards or permit requirements adopted by the 2Board under this Act. However, no permit shall be required 3under this Title V for the land application of vegetable 4by-products conducted pursuant to Agency permit issued under 5Title III of this Act to the generator of the vegetable 6by-products. In addition, vegetable by-products may be 7transported in this State without a special waste hauling 8permit, and without the preparation and carrying of a 9manifest.10    (v) (Blank).11    (w) Conduct any generation, transportation, or recycling 12of construction or demolition debris, clean or general, or 13uncontaminated soil generated during construction, remodeling, 14repair, and demolition of utilities, structures, and roads 15that is not commingled with any waste, without the maintenance 16of documentation identifying the hauler, generator, place of 17origin of the debris or soil, the weight or volume of the 18debris or soil, and the location, owner, and operator of the 19facility where the debris or soil was transferred, disposed, 20recycled, or treated. This documentation must be maintained by 21the generator, transporter, or recycler for 3 years. This 22subsection (w) shall not apply to (1) a permitted pollution 23control facility that transfers or accepts construction or 24demolition debris, clean or general, or uncontaminated soil 25for final disposal, recycling, or treatment, (2) a public 26utility (as that term is defined in the Public Utilities Act)   HB1347- 19 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1or a municipal utility, (3) the Illinois Department of 2Transportation, or (4) a municipality or a county highway 3department, with the exception of any municipality or county 4highway department located within a county having a population 5of over 3,000,000 inhabitants or located in a county that is 6contiguous to a county having a population of over 3,000,000 7inhabitants; but it shall apply to an entity that contracts 8with a public utility, a municipal utility, the Illinois 9Department of Transportation, or a municipality or a county 10highway department. The terms "generation" and "recycling", as 11used in this subsection, do not apply to clean construction or 12demolition debris when (i) used as fill material below grade 13outside of a setback zone if covered by sufficient 14uncontaminated soil to support vegetation within 30 days of 15the completion of filling or if covered by a road or structure, 16(ii) solely broken concrete without protruding metal bars is 17used for erosion control, or (iii) milled asphalt or crushed 18concrete is used as aggregate in construction of the shoulder 19of a roadway. The terms "generation" and "recycling", as used 20in this subsection, do not apply to uncontaminated soil that 21is not commingled with any waste when (i) used as fill material 22below grade or contoured to grade, or (ii) used at the site of 23generation.24    (y) Inject any carbon dioxide stream produced by a carbon 25dioxide capture project into a Class II well, as defined by the 26Board under this Act, or a Class VI well converted from a Class   HB1347- 20 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1II well, for purposes of enhanced oil or gas recovery, 2including, but not limited to, the facilitation of enhanced 3oil or gas recovery from another well.4    (z) Sell or transport concentrated carbon dioxide stream 5produced by a carbon dioxide capture project for use in 6enhanced oil or gas recovery.7    (aa) Operate a carbon sequestration activity in a manner 8that causes, threatens, or allows the release of carbon 9dioxide so as to tend to cause water pollution in this State. 10    (bb) Operate a wind energy conversion facility in a manner 11that causes, threatens, or allows the release of oil, 12lubricant, hydraulic fluid, transformer solvent, insulation 13fluid, cleaning fluid, or any other similar fluid from the 14wind energy conversion facility. 15(Source: P.A. 102-216, eff. 1-1-22; 102-310, eff. 8-6-21; 16102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-342, eff. 171-1-24; 103-651, eff. 7-18-24.) 18    (415 ILCS 5/42)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1042)19    Sec. 42. Civil penalties. 20    (a) Except as provided in this Section, any person that 21violates any provision of this Act or any regulation adopted 22by the Board, or any permit or term or condition thereof, or 23that violates any order of the Board pursuant to this Act, 24shall be liable for a civil penalty of not to exceed $50,000 25for the violation and an additional civil penalty of not to   HB1347- 21 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1exceed $10,000 for each day during which the violation 2continues; such penalties may, upon order of the Board or a 3court of competent jurisdiction, be made payable to the 4Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in accordance 5with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund 6Act.7    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of 8this Section:9        (1) Any person that violates Section 12(f) of this Act 10    or any NPDES permit or term or condition thereof, or any 11    filing requirement, regulation or order relating to the 12    NPDES permit program, shall be liable to a civil penalty 13    of not to exceed $10,000 per day of violation.14        (2) Any person that violates Section 12(g) of this Act 15    or any UIC permit or term or condition thereof, or any 16    filing requirement, regulation or order relating to the 17    State UIC program for all wells, except Class II wells as 18    defined by the Board under this Act, shall be liable to a 19    civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 per day of violation; 20    provided, however, that any person who commits such 21    violations relating to the State UIC program for Class II 22    wells, as defined by the Board under this Act, shall be 23    liable to a civil penalty of not to exceed $10,000 for the 24    violation and an additional civil penalty of not to exceed 25    $1,000 for each day during which the violation continues.26        (3) Any person that violates Sections 21(f), 21(g),   HB1347- 22 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    21(h) or 21(i) of this Act, or any RCRA permit or term or 2    condition thereof, or any filing requirement, regulation 3    or order relating to the State RCRA program, shall be 4    liable to a civil penalty of not to exceed $25,000 per day 5    of violation.6        (4) In an administrative citation action under Section 7    31.1 of this Act, any person found to have violated any 8    provision of subsection (o) of Section 21 of this Act 9    shall pay a civil penalty of $500 for each violation of 10    each such provision, plus any hearing costs incurred by 11    the Board and the Agency. Such penalties shall be made 12    payable to the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be 13    used in accordance with the provisions of the 14    Environmental Protection Trust Fund Act; except that if a 15    unit of local government issued the administrative 16    citation, 50% of the civil penalty shall be payable to the 17    unit of local government.18        (4-5) In an administrative citation action under 19    Section 31.1 of this Act, any person found to have 20    violated any provision of subsection (p) of Section 21, 21    Section 22.38, Section 22.51, Section 22.51a, or 22    subsection (k) of Section 55 of this Act shall pay a civil 23    penalty of $1,500 for each violation of each such 24    provision, plus any hearing costs incurred by the Board 25    and the Agency, except that the civil penalty amount shall 26    be $3,000 for each violation of any provision of   HB1347- 23 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    subsection (p) of Section 21, Section 22.38, Section 2    22.51, Section 22.51a, or subsection (k) of Section 55 3    that is the person's second or subsequent adjudication 4    violation of that provision. The penalties shall be 5    deposited into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to 6    be used in accordance with the provisions of the 7    Environmental Protection Trust Fund Act; except that if a 8    unit of local government issued the administrative 9    citation, 50% of the civil penalty shall be payable to the 10    unit of local government.11        (5) Any person who violates subsection 6 of Section 12    39.5 of this Act or any CAAPP permit, or term or condition 13    thereof, or any fee or filing requirement, or any duty to 14    allow or carry out inspection, entry or monitoring 15    activities, or any regulation or order relating to the 16    CAAPP shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed 17    $10,000 per day of violation.18        (6) Any owner or operator of a community water system 19    that violates subsection (b) of Section 18.1 or subsection 20    (a) of Section 25d-3 of this Act shall, for each day of 21    violation, be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5 22    for each of the premises connected to the affected 23    community water system.24        (7) Any person who violates Section 52.5 of this Act 25    shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for the 26    first violation of that Section and a civil penalty of up   HB1347- 24 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    to $2,500 for a second or subsequent violation of that 2    Section. 3        (8) Any person who violates subsection (bb) of Section 4    21 of this Act shall, for each day of violation, be liable 5    for a civil penalty of $1,000 for every wind turbine in a 6    wind energy conversion facility operating in violation of 7    subsection (bb) of Section 21. 8    (b.5) In lieu of the penalties set forth in subsections 9(a) and (b) of this Section, any person who fails to file, in a 10timely manner, toxic chemical release forms with the Agency 11pursuant to Section 25b-2 of this Act shall be liable for a 12civil penalty of $100 per day for each day the forms are late, 13not to exceed a maximum total penalty of $6,000. This daily 14penalty shall begin accruing on the thirty-first day after the 15date that the person receives the warning notice issued by the 16Agency pursuant to Section 25b-6 of this Act; and the penalty 17shall be paid to the Agency. The daily accrual of penalties 18shall cease as of January 1 of the following year. All 19penalties collected by the Agency pursuant to this subsection 20shall be deposited into the Environmental Protection Permit 21and Inspection Fund.22    (c) Any person that violates this Act, any rule or 23regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or 24condition of a permit, or any Board order and causes the death 25of fish or aquatic life shall, in addition to the other 26penalties provided by this Act, be liable to pay to the State   HB1347- 25 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1an additional sum for the reasonable value of the fish or 2aquatic life destroyed. Any money so recovered shall be placed 3in the Wildlife and Fish Fund in the State Treasury.4    (d) The penalties provided for in this Section may be 5recovered in a civil action.6    (e) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 7violation occurred, or the Attorney General, may, at the 8request of the Agency or on his own motion, institute a civil 9action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 10restrain violations of this Act, any rule or regulation 11adopted under this Act, any permit or term or condition of a 12permit, or any Board order, or to require such other actions as 13may be necessary to address violations of this Act, any rule or 14regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or 15condition of a permit, or any Board order.16    (f) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 17violation occurred, or the Attorney General, shall bring such 18actions in the name of the people of the State of Illinois. 19Without limiting any other authority which may exist for the 20awarding of attorney's fees and costs, the Board or a court of 21competent jurisdiction may award costs and reasonable 22attorney's fees, including the reasonable costs of expert 23witnesses and consultants, to the State's Attorney or the 24Attorney General in a case where he has prevailed against a 25person who has committed a willful, knowing, or repeated 26violation of this Act, any rule or regulation adopted under   HB1347- 26 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1this Act, any permit or term or condition of a permit, or any 2Board order.3    Any funds collected under this subsection (f) in which the 4Attorney General has prevailed shall be deposited in the 5Hazardous Waste Fund created in Section 22.2 of this Act. Any 6funds collected under this subsection (f) in which a State's 7Attorney has prevailed shall be retained by the county in 8which he serves.9    (g) All final orders imposing civil penalties pursuant to 10this Section shall prescribe the time for payment of such 11penalties. If any such penalty is not paid within the time 12prescribed, interest on such penalty at the rate set forth in 13subsection (a) of Section 1003 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, 14shall be paid for the period from the date payment is due until 15the date payment is received. However, if the time for payment 16is stayed during the pendency of an appeal, interest shall not 17accrue during such stay.18    (h) In determining the appropriate civil penalty to be 19imposed under subdivisions (a), (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3), 20(b)(5), (b)(6), or (b)(7), or (b)(8) of this Section, the 21Board is authorized to consider any matters of record in 22mitigation or aggravation of penalty, including, but not 23limited to, the following factors:24        (1) the duration and gravity of the violation;25        (2) the presence or absence of due diligence on the 26    part of the respondent in attempting to comply with   HB1347- 27 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    requirements of this Act and regulations thereunder or to 2    secure relief therefrom as provided by this Act;3        (3) any economic benefits accrued by the respondent 4    because of delay in compliance with requirements, in which 5    case the economic benefits shall be determined by the 6    lowest cost alternative for achieving compliance;7        (4) the amount of monetary penalty which will serve to 8    deter further violations by the respondent and to 9    otherwise aid in enhancing voluntary compliance with this 10    Act by the respondent and other persons similarly subject 11    to the Act;12        (5) the number, proximity in time, and gravity of 13    previously adjudicated violations of this Act by the 14    respondent;15        (6) whether the respondent voluntarily self-disclosed, 16    in accordance with subsection (i) of this Section, the 17    non-compliance to the Agency;18        (7) whether the respondent has agreed to undertake a 19    "supplemental environmental project", which means an 20    environmentally beneficial project that a respondent 21    agrees to undertake in settlement of an enforcement action 22    brought under this Act, but which the respondent is not 23    otherwise legally required to perform; and24        (8) whether the respondent has successfully completed 25    a Compliance Commitment Agreement under subsection (a) of 26    Section 31 of this Act to remedy the violations that are   HB1347- 28 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    the subject of the complaint. 2    In determining the appropriate civil penalty to be imposed 3under subsection (a) or paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (6), or 4(7), or (8) of subsection (b) of this Section, the Board shall 5ensure, in all cases, that the penalty is at least as great as 6the economic benefits, if any, accrued by the respondent as a 7result of the violation, unless the Board finds that 8imposition of such penalty would result in an arbitrary or 9unreasonable financial hardship. However, such civil penalty 10may be off-set in whole or in part pursuant to a supplemental 11environmental project agreed to by the complainant and the 12respondent.13    (i) A person who voluntarily self-discloses non-compliance 14to the Agency, of which the Agency had been unaware, is 15entitled to a 100% reduction in the portion of the penalty that 16is not based on the economic benefit of non-compliance if the 17person can establish the following:18        (1) that either the regulated entity is a small entity 19    or the non-compliance was discovered through an 20    environmental audit or a compliance management system 21    documented by the regulated entity as reflecting the 22    regulated entity's due diligence in preventing, detecting, 23    and correcting violations;24        (2) that the non-compliance was disclosed in writing 25    within 30 days of the date on which the person discovered 26    it;  HB1347- 29 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1        (3) that the non-compliance was discovered and 2    disclosed prior to:3            (i) the commencement of an Agency inspection, 4        investigation, or request for information;5            (ii) notice of a citizen suit;6            (iii) the filing of a complaint by a citizen, the 7        Illinois Attorney General, or the State's Attorney of 8        the county in which the violation occurred;9            (iv) the reporting of the non-compliance by an 10        employee of the person without that person's 11        knowledge; or12            (v) imminent discovery of the non-compliance by 13        the Agency;14        (4) that the non-compliance is being corrected and any 15    environmental harm is being remediated in a timely 16    fashion;17        (5) that the person agrees to prevent a recurrence of 18    the non-compliance;19        (6) that no related non-compliance events have 20    occurred in the past 3 years at the same facility or in the 21    past 5 years as part of a pattern at multiple facilities 22    owned or operated by the person;23        (7) that the non-compliance did not result in serious 24    actual harm or present an imminent and substantial 25    endangerment to human health or the environment or violate 26    the specific terms of any judicial or administrative order   HB1347- 30 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1    or consent agreement;2        (8) that the person cooperates as reasonably requested 3    by the Agency after the disclosure; and4        (9) that the non-compliance was identified voluntarily 5    and not through a monitoring, sampling, or auditing 6    procedure that is required by statute, rule, permit, 7    judicial or administrative order, or consent agreement.8    If a person can establish all of the elements under this 9subsection except the element set forth in paragraph (1) of 10this subsection, the person is entitled to a 75% reduction in 11the portion of the penalty that is not based upon the economic 12benefit of non-compliance.13    For the purposes of this subsection (i), "small entity" 14has the same meaning as in Section 221 of the federal Small 15Business Regulatory Enforcement Fairness Act of 1996 (5 U.S.C. 16601). 17    (j) In addition to any other remedy or penalty that may 18apply, whether civil or criminal, any person who violates 19Section 22.52 of this Act shall be liable for an additional 20civil penalty of up to 3 times the gross amount of any 21pecuniary gain resulting from the violation. 22    (k) In addition to any other remedy or penalty that may 23apply, whether civil or criminal, any person who violates 24subdivision (a)(7.6) of Section 31 of this Act shall be liable 25for an additional civil penalty of $2,000. 26    (l) A person who promptly and voluntarily self-discloses   HB1347- 31 -LRB104 06942 BDA 16979 b1non-compliance with subsection (bb) of Section 21 of this Act 2to the Agency, of which the Agency had been unaware, and who 3promptly begins repairs and remediation to come into 4compliance with subsection (bb) of Section 21 of this Act, is 5entitled to a 100% reduction in the portion of the penalty 6under this Section.7(Source: P.A. 102-310, eff. 8-6-21.)